en: Occupant classification sensor support: Compatible (transfer OEM sensor); Includes sensor; Not compatible (no provision); Unknown; Other
bg-BG: Поддръжка на сензор за класификация на пътника: Съвместим (прехвърляне на OEM сензор); Включва сензор; Несъвместим (без опция); Неизвестен; Друго
sk-SK: Podpora snímača klasifikácie obsadenia sedadla: Kompatibilné (prenos OEM snímača); Vrátane snímača; Nekompatibilné (bez prípravy); Neznáma; Iná
vi: Hỗ trợ cảm biến phân loại người sử dụng: Tương thích (chuyển cảm biến OEM); Bao gồm cảm biến; Không tương thích (không hỗ trợ); Không rõ; Khác
nl: Ondersteuning voor inzittendeclassificatiesensor: Compatibel (overzetten OEM-sensor); Inclusief sensor; Niet compatibel (geen voorziening); Onbekend; Overig
pt-PT: Sensor de classificação de ocupantes assistência: Compatível (transferência de sensor OEM); Inclui sensor; Não compatível (sem provisão); Desconhecido; Outro
zh-TW: 乘員分類感測器支援: 相容 (轉移 OEM 感測器); 包含感測器; 不相容 (未提供); 未知; 其他
cs: Podpora senzoru klasifikace obsazenosti: Kompatibilní (přenos originálního senzoru); Včetně senzoru; Nekompatibilní (bez přípravy); Neznámé; Ostatní
ko: 탑승자 분류 센서 지원: 호환 가능(OEM 센서 전송); 센서 포함; 호환 불가(제공 안 됨); 알 수 없음; 기타
hu: Utasbesorolási érzékelő támogatása: Kompatibilis (OEM-érzékelő áthelyezése); Érzékelővel ellátott; Nem kompatibilis (nincs előkészítés); Ismeretlen; Egyéb
sl-SI: Podpora senzorja za klasifikacijo potnikov: Združljivo (prenos senzorja OEM); Vključuje senzor; Ni združljivo (ni predvideno); Neznano; Drugo
da: Understøttelse af passagerklassificeringssensor: Kompatibel (flyt OEM-sensor); Inkluderer sensor; Ikke kompatibel (ingen klargøring); Ukendt; Andet
th: การรองรับเซ็นเซอร์จำแนกประเภทผู้โดยสาร: เข้ากันได้ (ถ่ายโอนเซ็นเซอร์ OEM); รวมเซ็นเซอร์; ไม่รองรับ (ไม่มีการเตรียมช่องไว้); ไม่ทราบ; อื่นๆ
de: Unterstützung für Insassenklassifizierungssensoren: Kompatibel (Übernahme des OEM-Sensors); Inklusive Sensor; Nicht kompatibel (keine Vorrichtung); Unbekannt; Andere
es: Compatibilidad con sensor de clasificación de ocupante: Compatible (transferir sensor OEM); Incluye sensor; No compatible (sin provisión); Desconocido; Otro
hr-HR: Podrška za senzor klasifikacije putnika: Kompatibilno (prijenos OEM senzora); Uključuje senzor; Nije kompatibilno (nema priključka); Nepoznato; Ostalo
sv: Stöd för passagerarklassificeringssensor: Kompatibel (flytta över OEM-sensor); Inkluderar sensor; Ej kompatibel (ingen anslutning); Okänt; Övrigt
ro-RO: Senzor de clasificare a ocupanților: Compatibil (transfer senzor OEM); Include senzor; Incompatibil (fără suport); Necunoscut; Altele
tr: Yolcu sınıflandırma sensörü desteği: Uyumlu (OEM sensör aktarımı); Sensör dahil; Uyumlu değil (karşılığı yok); Bilinmiyor; Diğer
lt-LT: Keleivio klasifikavimo jutiklio palaikymas: Suderinama (perkeliamas OEM jutiklis); Yra jutiklis; Nesuderinama (nenumatyta); Nežinoma; Kita
nb: Støtte for sensorer for klassifisering av passasjer: Kompatibel (overføring av OEM-sensor); Inkluderer sensor; Ikke kompatibel (ingen tilrettelegging); Ukjent; Annet
zh-CN: 乘员分类传感器支持: 兼容（转移原厂传感器）; 包含传感器; 不兼容（无配备）; 未知; 其他
el: Υποστήριξη αισθητήρα ταξινόμησης επιβατών: Συμβατό (μεταφορά εργοστασιακού αισθητήρα); Περιλαμβάνει αισθητήρα; Μη συμβατό (καμία πρόβλεψη); Άγνωστο; Άλλο
it: Supporto per sensore di classificazione dell'occupante: Compatibile (trasferimento sensore OEM); Include sensore; Non compatibile (nessuna predisposizione); Sconosciuto; Altro
ja: 占有分類センサーのサポート: 互換性あり (OEMセンサー転用); センサー付属; 互換性なし (機能なし); 不明; その他
pl: Obsługa czujnika klasyfikacji pasażera: Kompatybilne (przeniesienie czujnika OEM); Zawiera czujnik; Niekompatybilne (brak przystosowania); Nieznane; Inne
pt-BR: Sensor de classificação de ocupante suporte: Compatível (transferência de sensor OEM); Inclui sensor; Não compatível (sem provisão); Desconhecido; Outro
fr: Prise en charge du capteur de classification de l’occupant: Compatible (transfert du capteur d'origine); Capteur inclus; Non compatible (sans emplacement); Inconnu; Autre
fi: Matkustajan luokitteluanturin tuki: Yhteensopiva (siirrä OEM-anturi); Sisältää anturin; Ei yhteensopiva (ei valmiutta); Tuntematon; Muu
ru: Поддержка датчика классификации пассажира: Совместимо (перенос заводского датчика); Включает датчик; Несовместимо (не предусмотрено); Неизвестно; Другое